Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1117.03
Computer file data; release; violations; penalties.

Any public official or employee who shall violate the provisions of section 81-1117.02 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor and shall be subject to removal from office or discharge in the discretion of the Governor or agency head as appropriate.

Laws 1975, LB 472, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 304.